Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 40 Body Art Studios

31-40-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Body art” means a tattoo or piercing placed on the body of a person for aesthetic or cosmetic purposes.

“Body artist” means any person who performs body art. Such term shall not include in its meaning any physician or osteopath licensed under Chapter 34 of Title 43, nor shall it include any technician acting under the direct supervision of such licensed physician or osteopath, pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 16-5-71.

“Body art studio” means any facility or building on a fixed foundation wherein a body artist performs body art.

“Microblading of the eyebrow” means a form of cosmetic tattoo artistry where ink is deposited superficially in the upper three layers of the epidermis using a handheld or machine powered tool made up of needles known as a microblade to improve or create eyebrow definition, to cover gaps of lost or missing hair, to extend the natural eyebrow pattern, or to create a full construction if the eyebrows have little to no hair.

“Tattoo” means to mark or color the skin by pricking in, piercing, or implanting indelible pigments or dyes under the skin. Such term includes microblading of the eyebrow.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-40-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 446, § 2; Ga. L. 2018, p. 996, § 1/SB 461; Ga. L. 2019, p. 462, § 2-1/SB 214.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added paragraph (1); redesignated former paragraphs (1) through (3) as present paragraphs (2) through (4), respectively; and added the second sentence in present paragraph (2).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added paragraphs (1) through (3); redesignated former paragraphs (1) and (2) as present paragraphs (4) and (5), respectively; inserted “or machine powered” in the middle of paragraph (4); and deleted former paragraphs (3) and (4), which read: “(3) ‘Tattoo artist’ means any person who performs tattooing, except that the term tattoo artist shall not include in its meaning any physician or osteopath licensed under Chapter 34 of Title 43, nor shall it include any technician acting under the direct supervision of such licensed physician or osteopath, pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 16-5-71.

“(4) ‘Tattoo studio’ means any facility or building on a fixed foundation wherein a tattoo artist performs tattooing.”

31-40-2.
Issuance of permits.

It shall be unlawful for any person to operate a body art studio or perform body art without having first obtained a valid permit. Body art studio permits shall be issued by the county board of health or its duly authorized representative, subject to supervision and direction by the department. Body artist permits shall be issued by the Department of Public Health. Permits shall be valid until suspended or revoked and shall not be transferable.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-40-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 446, § 2; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214; Ga. L. 2019, p. 462, § 2-1/SB 214.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, rewrote this Code section, which read: “It shall be unlawful for any person to operate a tattoo studio without having first obtained a valid permit for such studio. Such permits shall be issued by the county board of health or its duly authorized representative, subject to supervision and direction by the Department of Public Health but, where the county board of health is not functioning, the permit shall be issued by the department. A permit shall be valid until suspended or revoked and shall not be transferable with respect to person or location.”

Editor’s notes.

For application of this statute in 2020 and 2021, see Executive Orders 04.02.20.01, 04.20.20.01, 04.23.20.02, 05.12.20.02, 05.28.20.02, 06.11.20.01, 06.29.20.02, 07.15.20.01, 07.31.20.02, 08.15.20.01, 08.31.20.02, 09.15.20.01, 09.30.20.02, 10.15.20.01, 10.30.20.02, 11.13.20.01, 11.30.20.02, 12.08.20.01, 12.30.20.02, 01.15.21.01, 01.29.21.02, 02.15.21.01, 02.26.21.02, and 03.12.21.01.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-40-3.
Denial, suspension, and revocation of permit; notice and hearing.

The county boards of health may deny, suspend, or revoke a body art studio permit for a violation of this chapter or the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder. When, in the judgment of such board or its duly authorized agents, it is necessary and proper that such application for a permit be denied or that a permit previously granted be suspended or revoked, the applicant or holder of the permit shall be so notified in writing and shall be afforded an opportunity for hearing as provided in Article 1 of Chapter 5 of this title. In the event that such application is finally denied or such permit finally suspended or revoked, the applicant for or holder of such permit shall be given notice in writing, which notice shall specifically state the reasons why the application or permit has been suspended, revoked, or denied.

The department may deny, suspend, or revoke a body artist permit for a violation of this chapter or the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, after notice to the permit holder and opportunity for hearing. Such proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

31-40-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 446, § 2; Ga. L. 2019, p. 462, § 2-1/SB 214.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, designated the existing provisions of this Code section as subsection (a); rewrote the first sentence, which read: “The county boards of health may suspend or revoke permits where the health and safety of the public requires such action.”; and added subsection (b).

31-40-4.
Administrative review of order of county board of health.

Any person substantially affected by any final order of the county board of health denying, suspending, revoking, or refusing to renew a body artist studio permit provided under this chapter may secure review thereof by appeal to the department as provided in Article 1 of Chapter 5 of this title.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-40-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 446, § 2; Ga. L. 2019, p. 462, § 2-1/SB 214.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “a body artist studio permit” for “any permit” in the middle of this Code section.

31-40-5.
Rules and regulations.

The department shall have the power to adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to ensure the protection of the public health. Such rules and regulations shall prescribe health and safety standards for body artists and body art studios with regard to:

Location and cleanliness of facilities;

Sterilization and Occupational Safety and Health Administration guidelines for the prevention and spread of infectious diseases by all personnel;

Informed consent by the person receiving any form of body art;

Procedures for ensuring adequate explanation to consumers of the proper subsequent care of any form of body art;

Proper use and maintenance of equipment, including tools, dyes, and pigments; and

Competence and specialized knowledge of body artists.

County boards of health are empowered to adopt and promulgate supplementary rules and regulations consistent with those adopted and promulgated by the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-40-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 446, § 2; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214; Ga. L. 2019, p. 462, § 2-1/SB 214.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in subsection (a), substituted “The department” for “The Department of Public Health and county boards of health” near the beginning of the first sentence and substituted “health and safety standards for body artists and body art studios” for “reasonable standards for health and safety of tattoo studios” in the second sentence; substituted “any form of body art” for “a tattoo” at the end of paragraphs (a)(3) and (a)(4); substituted “maintenance of equipment, including tools, dyes, and pigments; and” for “maintenance of tattoo equipment, including dyes and pigments.” in paragraph (a)(5); and added paragraph (a)(6).

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-40-6.
Enforcement of chapter; inspection of premises.

The department and the county boards of health and their duly authorized agents are authorized and empowered to enforce compliance with this chapter and the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under this chapter and, in connection therewith, to enter upon and inspect the premises of a body art studio at any reasonable time and in a reasonable manner, as provided in Article 2 of Chapter 5 of this title.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-40-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 446, § 2; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214; Ga. L. 2019, p. 462, § 2-1/SB 214.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “The department” for “The Department of Public Health” at the beginning and substituted “body art studio” for “tattoo studio” near the end.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-40-7.
Criminal penalty.

Any person, firm, or corporation performing body art without a valid permit shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-40-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 446, § 2; Ga. L. 2019, p. 462, § 2-1/SB 214.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “performing body art” for “operating a tattoo studio” near the beginning and deleted “or performing tattooing outside of a licensed tattoo studio” following “valid permit” near the middle of this Code section.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1994, “licensed” was substituted for “license”.

31-40-8.
Display of notification concerning disqualification from military service.

Each body art studio shall conspicuously display in a prominent place easily seen by patrons a printed sign that warns that any body art on the face, neck, forearm, hand, or lower leg of an individual may automatically disqualify such individual from military service in the armed forces of the United States. Such notice shall be at least 11 inches by 14 inches in size, with letters at least one inch in height.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-40-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 446, § 2; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214; Ga. L. 2019, p. 462, § 2-1/SB 214.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted the present provisions of this Code section for the former provisions, which read: “The Department of Public Health is authorized and directed to develop and institute a program of public education for the purpose of alerting the public to the possible side effects and exposure risks of tattooing.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-40-9.
Enactment of more stringent laws.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the governing authority of any county or municipality may enact more stringent laws governing body art.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-40-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 446, § 2; Ga. L. 2019, p. 462, § 2-1/SB 214.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “body art” for “tattooing” at the end of this Code section.

31-40-10.
Criminal law not repealed.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to repeal the provisions of Code Section 16-12-5; provided, however, that Code Section 16-12-5 shall not apply to microblading of the eyebrow.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-40-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 446, § 2; Ga. L. 2018, p. 996, § 2/SB 461; Ga. L. 2019, p. 462, § 2-1/SB 214.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added the proviso at the end of this Code section.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1994, “chapter” was substituted for “Act”.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2019, p. 462, § 2-1/SB 214, effective July 1, 2019, reenacted this Code section without change.